Maryland, session 2026, HB0912.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
10–604.
(a) [A] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A person may not:
(1) overdrive or overload an animal;
(2) deprive an animal of necessary sustenance;
(3) inflict unnecessary suffering or pain on an animal;
(4) cause, procure, or authorize an act prohibited under item (1), (2), or (3)
of this subsection; or
(5) if the person has charge or custody of an animal, as owner or otherwise,
unnecessarily fail to provide the animal with:
(i) nutritious food in sufficient quantity;
(ii) necessary veterinary care;
(iii) proper drink;
(iv) proper air;
(v) proper space;
(vi) proper shelter; or
(vii) proper protection from the weather.
(b) A PERSON WHO PROVIDES CARE TO A COMMUNITY CAT UNDER A
TRAP–NEUTER–RETURN POLICY IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 1–1321 OF THE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE MAY NOT BE DEEMED AS HAVING CHARGE OR CUSTODY OF
THE COMMUNITY CAT UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(5) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) (1) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on
conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 90 days or a fine not exceeding $1,000
or both.
(2) As a condition of sentencing, the court may order a defendant convicted
of violating this section to:

HOUSE BILL 912 3
(i) participate in and pay for psychological counseling; and
(ii) pay, in addition to any other fines and costs, all reasonable costs
incurred in removing, housing, treating, or euthanizing an animal confiscated from the
defendant.
(3) As a condition of probation, the court may prohibit a defendant from
owning, possessing, or residing with an animal.
10–612.
(a) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A PERSON WHO IS PROVIDING CARE
TO A COMMUNITY CAT UNDER A TRAP–NEUTER–RETURN POLICY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 1–1321 OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(B) A person who owns, possesses, or has custody of a domestic animal may not
drop or leave the animal on a road, in a public place, or on private property with the intent
to abandon the animal.
[(b)] (C) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on
conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding $100.
Article – Local Government
1–1321.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “COMMUNITY CAT” MEANS A FREE–ROAMING CAT THAT
MAY BE CARED FOR BY ONE OR MORE RESIDENTS OF THE IMMEDIATE AREA WITHIN
WHICH THE CAT IS LOCATED.
(II) “COMMUNITY CAT” INCLUDES A FERAL CAT.
(3) (I) “COMMUNITY CAT CAREGIVER” MEANS A PERSON WHO
PROVIDES CARE TO A COMMUNITY CAT, INCLUDING FOOD, SHELTER, OR MEDICAL
CARE, UNDER A TRAP–NEUTER–RETURN POLICY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SECTION.
(II) “COMMUNITY CAT CAREGIVER” DOES NOT INCLUDE A
PERSON WHO IS CONSIDERED THE OWNER, HARBORER, CONTROLLER, OR KEEPER
OF A COMMUNITY CAT.

HOUSE BILL 912
(4) “EARTIP” MEANS A PROCEDURE THAT:
(I) REMOVES THE DISTAL ONE–QUARTER OF THE LEFT EAR OF
A COMMUNITY CAT;
(II) IS PERFORMED USING ANESTHESIA UNDER THE
SUPERVISION OF A LICENSED VETERINARIAN; AND
(III) IS DESIGNED TO IDENTIFY A COMMUNITY CAT AS BEING
STERILIZED AND VACCINATED FOR RABIES.
(5) (I) “TRAP–NEUTER–RETURN” MEANS TO HUMANELY TRAP,
STERILIZE, VACCINATE FOR RABIES, EARTIP, AND RETURN A COMMUNITY CAT TO
THE LOCATION WHERE THE CAT WAS ORIGINALLY TRAPPED.
(II) “TRAP–NEUTER–RETURN” INCLUDES PROVIDING CARE TO
A COMMUNITY CAT.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO ALL COUNTIES AND MUNICIPALITIES.
(C) A LOCAL LAW THAT ESTABLISHES A TRAP–NEUTER–RETURN POLICY:
(1) MAY NOT REQUIRE ANY REGISTRATION OR CERTIFICATION
PROCESS FOR A COMMUNITY CAT CAREGIVER;
(2) SHALL AUTHORIZE THE TRAPPING OF A COMMUNITY CAT TO
STERILIZE, VACCINATE FOR RABIES, AND EARTIP THE COMMUNITY CAT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH FEDERAL OR STATE LAW;
(3) SHALL AUTHORIZE A COMMUNITY CAT CAREGIVER TO RECLAIM
AN IMPOUNDED COMMUNITY CAT WITHOUT PROOF OF OWNERSHIP FOR THE
PURPOSE OF:
(I) CARRYING OUT A TRAP–NEUTER–RETURN POLICY; OR
(II) RETURNING AN EARTIPPED CAT TO THE LOCATION WHERE
THE CAT WAS ORIGINALLY TRAPPED;
(4) UNLESS VETERINARY CARE IS REQUIRED OR A LOCATION IS
DEEMED UNSAFE FOR RETURN OF AN EARTIPPED CAT, SHALL REQUIRE THAT:
(I) AN EARTIPPED CAT THAT IS RECEIVED BY A LOCAL SHELTER
BE RETURNED TO THE LOCATION WHERE THE CAT WAS ORIGINALLY TRAPPED; AND

HOUSE BILL 912 5
(II) AN EARTIPPED CAT THAT IS TRAPPED BE RETURNED
ON–SITE; AND
(5) SHALL ESTABLISH TRAP–NEUTER–RETURN AS THE PREFERRED
DISPOSITION OF AN IMPOUNDED COMMUNITY CAT.
(D) THIS SECTION SUPERSEDES AND PREEMPTS ANY LAW, ORDINANCE,
POLICY, OR REGULATION OF ANY LOCAL GOVERNMENT BODY, AND ANY POLICY OR
RULE OF ANY PERSON OR CORPORATION, THAT PROHIBITS OR RESTRICTS THE
PRACTICE OF TRAP–NEUTER–RETURN.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.